Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-476.03
Restricted commercial driver's license, defined.

Restricted commercial driver's license shall mean a class of commercial driver's license issued in accordance with the requirements of the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act.

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 3.